Hawaii, session 2026, SB1624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that it is of critical importance to ensure that public funds are used specifically for their intended purposes.  It is essential that funds appropriated to the university of Hawaii for renew, improve, and modernize projects not be used for current or anticipated capital improvement projects.  Ensuring that funds are used specifically for their intended purpose will promote the integrity of state infrastructure investments and ensure that the maintenance and modernization of public facilities are appropriately prioritized. The legislature further finds that it is its responsibility to monitor and review the use of funds to renew, improve, and modernize existing university facilities.  To maintain transparency and accountability in the allocation and expenditure of these funds, it is necessary to require that the university of Hawaii provide detailed reports on projects that receive renew, improve, and modernize project funding. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require that the board of regents expend funds appropriated to renew, improve, and modernize projects for renew, improve, and modernize projects purposes only. SECTION 2.  Section 304A-2672, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§304A-2672  Powers of the board.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board may: (1)  Designate as a university project, any undertaking, improvement, or facility on any one or more of the areas in one or more of the educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the board; (2)  Construct and maintain university projects, including a university project included or to be in a university system; (3)  Expend funds for renew, improve, and modernize projects on any one or more of the areas in one or more of the educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the board; provided that the board shall not expend these funds on current, ongoing, or anticipated capital improvement projects; provided further that the board shall submit an annual report detailing the renew, improve, and modernize projects that received funding to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session; [(3)] (4) Combine two or more university projects into a university system on one or more of the areas on any one or more of the educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the board, and to maintain the system; [(4)] (5) Combine two or more university projects, university systems, or university projects and university systems into a network, on any one or more of the areas on any one or more of the educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the board, and to maintain the network; [(5)] (6) Prescribe and collect rents, fees, and charges for the use of or services furnished by any university project and the facilities thereof, and pledge any appropriation to any university project and the facilities thereof that in aggregate, produces revenue of the university at least sufficient to comply with section 304A-2681; [(6)] (7) With the approval of the governor, issue revenue bonds under this subpart in such principal amount as may be authorized by the legislature from time to time to finance in whole or in part the cost of construction or the cost of maintenance of any university project, including funding reserves therefor; [(7)] (8) Pledge to the punctual payment of revenue bonds and interest thereon, all or any part of the revenue of the university, including any appropriation, in an amount sufficient to pay the revenue bonds and interest as the same become due and to create and maintain reasonable reserves therefor; [(8)] (9) Establish a loan program or a commercial paper program upon terms and conditions that the board may determine; and [(9)] (10) Advance moneys of the university, not otherwise required, and do any and all other lawful acts as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable, for carrying into execution and administering this subpart." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________